West Virginia, session 2026, SB251.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. Authorization for Department of administration to promulgate legislative rules. §64-2-1. Department of Administration. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 22, 2025, authorized under the authority of §5A-13-6 of this code, modified by the Department of Administration to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 23, 2025, relating to the Department of Administration (One-Stop Shop Permitting Program, 148 CSR 25), is authorized. §64-2-2. Office of Technology. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 18, 2025, authorized under the authority of §5A-6B-3 of this code, modified by the Office of Technology to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on August 14, 2025, relating to the Office of Technology (cyber reporting, 163 CSR 03), is authorized. §64-2-3. Board of Risk and Insurance Management. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 18, 2025, authorized under the authority of §33-30-15 of this code, modified by the Board of Risk and Insurance Management to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on August 14, 2025, relating to the Board of Risk and Insurance Management (mine subsidence insurance, 115 CSR 01), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 8, 2025, authorized under the authority of §29-12-14 of this code, modified by the Board of Risk and Insurance Management to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 10, 2025, relating to the Board of Risk and Insurance Management (public entities insurance program, 115 CSR 02), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 21, 2025, authorized under the authority of §29-12-5 of this code, relating to the Board of Risk and Insurance Management (Preferred Medical Liability and High-Risk Medical Liability Program, 115 CSR 06), is authorized. The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. In effect from passage.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home